District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-125

Certain defective deeds and acknowledgments prior to January 1, 1969, validated

Repealed.

History

Apr. 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-110, § 4, 41 DCR 1023

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§  45-608 to 45-612.